dictionary/nia_NIA.aff
# this is the affix file of the nia_NIA Hunspell dictionary
# created from scratch by Sirus Laia
#
# Version: 20200607
#
# Copyright (C) 2019 Sirus Laia <laia.sirus@gmail.com>
#
# License: GPLv2, GPLv3
# There should be a copy of both of this licenses included
# with every distribution of this dictionary. Modified
# versions using the GPL may only include the GPL
# 
# This file was created based on the research paper
# written by Waözisökhi Nazara
# for his master at Universitas Udayana Bali 1999

SET UTF-8
TRY aiöounmʼglfetrshdwbkzyŵLYWpMFZvSRKj
#TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzöŵESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÖŴʼ

ICONV ' ʼ
#ICONV " ”

# Replacement

#REP 2
#REP hewaʼae heŵaʼae
#REP hauga haʼuga
#REP hezoso heza so
#REP hasambalö ha sambalö
#REP hegöi he göi

# Prefix

PFX A Y 4	# a-,  am-, ang-
PFX A   0	a	[dghiklmnprstwz]	#aduwa, afatö
PFX A   b	am	b	# bözi > amözi
PFX A   f	am	f	# fake > amake
PFX A   0	ang	[eo]	# owalu > angowalu, e'esi > ange'esi

PFX F Y 6	# fa-
PFX F   0	f	[ao]	# famadu, famesu, fanukhu, fangandrö, fo'ömö, fohalöŵö, folobö, fowöli, folowi
PFX F   0	fa	[bdfghklmnprstwz]	# fabago, fadou, falua, fanönö, falimo, fasao, fatezu, faŵara, 
PFX F   0	fa'	[aeioöu]	# anau > fa'anau, oböwö > fa'oböwö	
PFX F   0	fa'a	[tm]	# tehawu > fa'atehawu, teföfö > fa'ateföfö, mate > fa'amate
PFX F   b	fam	b	# bu'a > famu'a, bözi > famözi
PFX F   0	f	[ao]	# amölö > famölö, angombakha > fangombakha, ohalöŵö > fohalöŵö, owöli > fowöli
#PFX F   s	faz	s	# sökhi > fazökhi !!! fasasi, fasöbi

PFX L Y 1	# la-
PFX L   0	la

PFX M Y 7	# ma-
PFX M   0	m	[ao]	# mamadu, mamesu, manukhu, mangandrö, mo'ömö, mohalöŵö, molobö, mowöli, molowi
PFX M   0	ma	m	# mamofanö, mamoloi
PFX M   0	ma'a	m	# mamofanö, mamoloi
PFX M   b	mam	b	# mameta, mamörögö, mamoto, mamu'a
PFX M   s	man	s	# manese, manasa, manösö, manöbi
PFX M   t	man	t	# manörö, manahö, manebu, manöbi
PFX M   h	mang	h	# heta > mangeta, manasa, manösö, manöbi

PFX Me Y 5	# me-
PFX Me   0	me	[lŵ]	# melima, meŵalu
PFX Me   d	mendr	d	# mendrua, mendro
PFX Me   t	med	t	# medölu
PFX Me   f	mew	f	# mewitu
PFX Me   s	mez	s	# meziŵa

PFX Mu Y 1	# mu-
PFX Mu   0	mu	[tl]	# mutaba, mula'a

PFX N Y 2	# ni-
PFX N   0	ni	[bdfghklmnprstwz]	# nibadu, nisura, nitika
PFX N   0	ni'	[aeioöu]	# ni'oguna'ö, ni'owasa

PFX O Y 2	# o-
PFX O   0	o	l	# laŵa > olaŵa, leu > oleu
PFX O   r	ondr	r	# rino > ondrino, röi > ondröi

PFX S Y 2	# sa-
PFX S   0	sa	m	# samigu, samete
PFX S   0	s	[aeioöu]	# sangandrö, sanagö, side'ide, sohalöŵö, sowanua

PFX T Y 4	# ta-
PFX T   0	ta	[bdfghklmnprstwz]	# tabadu, tadodo, taföföni, tagamö, tahalö, takandro
PFX T   0	ta'	[aeioöu]	# ta'alui, ta'eregesi, ta'ifigö, ta'onoro, ta'ösö, ta'ungu
PFX T   0	te	[bdfghklmnprstwz]	# teduhö, tefa'anö, tesöndra
PFX T   0	te'	[aeioöu]	# te'agamöi, te'etu'ö, te'irö'ö, te'o'ou, te'ungugö

PFX W Y 6	# wa-
PFX W   0	wa'	[aeioöu]	# arörö
PFX W   b	wam	b	# bokai > wamokai
PFX W   f	wam	f	# fazaumba > wamazaumba
PFX W   m	wa	f
PFX W   0	wama
#PFX W   z	wama	s	# söbi
PFX W   0	wanga
PFX W   0	wo
PFX W   z	wo	s	# sasai

PFX Y Y 1	# ya-
PFX Y   0	ya


# Suffix

SFX I Y 1	# -i
SFX I   0	i	.

SFX O Y 1	# -ö
SFX O   0	'ö	[aeioöu]	# fera'ö

SFX G Y 1	# -gö
SFX G   0	gö	.	# höndrögö

SFX T Y 1	# -ta, angombakhata
SFX T   0	ta	.
